California, session 20252026, AB2596.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 798.14.5 is added to the Civil Code, to read:798.14.5.If798.14.5. (a) In the event that a mobilehome park operator or owner operator, owner, or management fails to to, or elects not to,comply with federal law or other federal requirements imposed in connection with a federally approved housing program, including, but not limited to, the Housing for Older Persons Act of 1995, the mobilehome park operator or owner operator, owner, or management shall ensure ongoing compliance with applicable state laws, including, but not limited to, this chapter, Sections 51.2 and 51.3, and applicable state and local						ordinances. laws and ordinances, including those regulating or requiring operation as a senior mobilehome park, or which define a mobilehome park or a senior mobilehome park under state or local laws.(b) In the event that a mobilehome park operator, owner, or management fails or elects not to conduct the age verification requirement under the Housing for Older Persons Act of 1995, a local agency may conduct the age verification by any means authorized by law, and shall have the right to access and inspect records of the mobilehome park operator, owner, and management to conduct the verification.